Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-214
Acknowledgments of written instruments; bank; oath; authorized; prior acknowledgments validated.

(1) It is lawful for any stockholder, director, officer, employee, or agent of a bank, who is a notary public, to take the acknowledgment of any person to any written instrument given to or by the bank and to administer an oath to any other stockholder, director, officer, employee, or agent of the bank.

(2) Acknowledgments heretofore taken of any person to any written instrument given to or by a bank or any oath administered to any stockholder, director, officer, employee, or agent of a bank by any notary public who was a stockholder, director, officer, employee, or agent of the bank shall be deemed to be lawful, valid, and binding.

Laws 1957, c. 316, § 1, p. 1134;

R.R.S.1943, § 76-217.04;

Laws 1976, LB 622, § 5;

Laws 2008, LB851, § 26.